Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.410

Center for research and training in intellectual and developmental disabilities—Established.

There is hereby established at the University of Washington a center for research and training in intellectual and developmental disabilities.

[ 2010 c 94 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.410. Prior: 1963 c 193 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.430.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2010 c 94: See note following RCW 44.04.280.